Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1207.03
Child welfare system; Department of Health and Human Services; staff training in suicide awareness and prevention.

All staff involved in the child welfare system of the Department of Health and Human Services that provide direct services to children or families or interact directly with children or families, and any other appropriate personnel as determined by the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Health and Human Services, shall have annual training in suicide awareness and prevention. Such training shall include current best practices of behavioral and mental health training with a focus on suicide awareness and prevention prior to any independent contact with youth and families. Such training shall be provided within the framework of existing training programs offered by the department.

Laws 2025, LB217, § 2.